Illinois, session 104th, SB1910.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 522-50 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/22-50)7    Sec. 22-50. Twice-exceptional children; recommendations.8    (a) The State Advisory Council on the Education of 9Children with Disabilities and the Advisory Council on the 10Education of Gifted and Talented Children shall research and 11discuss best practices for addressing the needs of 12"twice-exceptional" children, those who are gifted and 13talented and have a disability. The Councils shall then 14jointly make recommendations to the State Board of Education 15with respect to the State Board of Education providing 16guidance and technical assistance to school districts in 17furthering improved educational outcomes for gifted and 18twice-exceptional children. Recommendations shall include 19strategies to (i) educate teachers and other providers about 20the unique needs of this population, (ii) train teachers in 21target, research-based, identification and pedagogical 22methods, and (iii) establish guidelines for unique programming 23for twice-exceptional students.  SB1910- 2 -LRB104 09686 LNS 19752 b1    (b) As used in this Section, "twice-exceptional children" 2means children who have potential for high achievement who are 3talented or accelerated, would benefit from advanced academic 4programs, as defined in Section 14A-17 of this Code, and are 5eligible for an individualized education program (IEP) or for 6services under Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act 7of 1973, as defined by federal or State eligibility criteria.8    (c) In the development of the IEP or the Section 504 plan 9for a twice-exceptional child, if the child's ability or 10achievement indicates that the student would benefit from 11advanced academic programs as defined in Section 14A-17 of 12this Code, then those abilities or achievement levels shall be 13the primary focus of the child's IEP or Section 504 plan and be 14reflected in the individualized services, goals, and 15objectives for the child.16    (d) Best practices for identifying and addressing the 17educational and related needs of twice-exceptional children 18may include, but are not limited to:19        (1) individualizing services;20        (2) providing appropriate challenges for the child;21        (3) focusing on the strengths of the child first;22        (4) being flexible when grouping children;23        (5) allowing flexibility to show mastery;24        (6) grading by learning objective rather than by 25    execution of directions;26        (7) using a strength-based approach;  SB1910- 3 -LRB104 09686 LNS 19752 b1        (8) using a multidimensional approach to identify 2    twice-exceptional children;3        (9) using oral questions;4        (10) extending time for demonstrating knowledge;5        (11) offering assessment procedures that accommodate 6    language and cultural differences; and7        (12) using both formal and informal assessments. 8(Source: P.A. 96-382, eff. 8-13-09; 96-1000, eff. 7-2-10.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.